Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
PART 2 Voting Machines

21-2-320.
Power of municipal governing authority to authorize use of and to procure voting machines.

The governing authority of any municipality may at any regular meeting or at a special meeting called for the purpose, by a majority vote, authorize and direct the use of voting machines for recording and computing the vote at all elections held in the municipality; and thereupon the governing authority shall purchase, lease, rent, or otherwise procure voting machines conforming to the requirements of this part.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1202, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 38/HB 244.

21-2-321.
Referendum on question of use of voting machines.

The governing authority of any municipality which conducts elections by paper ballot may, upon its own motion, submit to the electors of the municipality, at any election, the question: “Shall voting machines be used in _________ ?”

The governing authority of any municipality which conducts elections by paper ballot, upon the receipt of a petition signed by at least 10 percent of the electors who voted in such municipality at the preceding general election, shall, at the next election occurring at least 45 days thereafter, submit to the electors of such municipality the question: “Shall voting machines be used in _________ ?”

The governing authority shall cause such question to be printed upon the ballots to be used at the election in the form and manner provided by the laws governing general elections.

The election on such question shall be held at the places, during the hours, and under the regulations provided by law for holding general elections and shall be conducted by the poll officers provided by law to conduct such elections. The poll officers shall count the votes cast at the election on such question and shall make return thereof to the superintendent of such municipality as required by law. The returns shall be computed by the superintendent and, when so computed, a certificate of the total number of electors voting “Yes” and of the total number of electors voting “No” on such question shall be filed in the office of the municipal governing authority and in the office of the Secretary of State.

Whenever, under this Code section, the question of the adoption of voting machines is about to be submitted to the electors of any municipality, it shall be the duty of the governing authority of such municipality to ascertain whether current funds will be available to pay for such machines, if adopted and purchased, or whether it has power to increase the indebtedness of the municipality in an amount sufficient to pay for the machines without the consent of the electors; and, if such current funds will not be available and the power to increase the indebtedness of the municipality in a sufficient amount without the consent of the electors is lacking, it shall be the duty of the governing authority to submit to the electors of the municipality, in the manner provided by law, at the same election at which the adoption of voting machines is to be voted on, the question of whether the indebtedness of such municipality shall be increased, in an amount specified by them, sufficient to pay for such voting machines, if adopted.

If a majority of the electors voting on such question or questions shall vote in the affirmative, the governing authority of such municipality shall purchase, lease, or rent voting machines, conforming to the requirements of this part, for recording and computing the vote at all elections held in such municipality.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1203, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 617, § 9; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 39/HB 244.

21-2-322.
General requirements as to voting machines.

No voting machine shall be adopted or used unless it shall, at the time, satisfy the following requirements:

It shall provide facilities for voting for such candidates as may be nominated and upon such questions as may be submitted;

It shall permit each elector, in one operation, to vote for all the candidates of one party or body for presidential electors;

Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this Code section for presidential electors, it shall permit each elector, at other than primaries, to vote a ticket selected from the nominees of any and all parties or bodies, from independent nominations, and from persons not in nomination;

It shall permit each elector to vote, at any election, for any person and for any office for whom and for which he or she is lawfully entitled to vote, whether or not the name of such person or persons appears upon a ballot label as a candidate for election; to vote for as many persons for an office as he or she is entitled to vote for; and to vote for or against any question upon which he or she is entitled to vote;

It shall preclude each elector from voting for any candidate or upon any question for whom or upon which he or she is not entitled to vote; from voting for more persons for any office than he or she is entitled to vote for; and from voting for any candidate for the same office or upon any question more than once;

It shall be capable of adjustment by poll officers so as to permit each elector at a primary to vote only for the candidates seeking nomination by the party in whose primary he or she is then voting and so as to preclude him or her from voting for the candidates seeking nomination by any party in whose primary he or she is not then voting;

It shall fairly permit each elector to deposit, write in, or affix upon receptacles or devices provided for the purpose ballots containing the names of persons for whom he or she desires to vote whose names do not appear upon the machine; provided, however, that, if the machine does not fairly permit such a vote to be cast, an elector desiring to vote for any person whose name does not appear on the machine shall be permitted to vote in the election by the use of a paper ballot which shall be furnished by the superintendent;

It shall permit each elector to change his or her vote for any candidate or upon any question appearing upon the ballot labels up to the time he or she begins to register his or her vote or indicates or expresses his or her intentions to register his or her vote;

It shall permit and require voting in absolute secrecy and shall be so constructed that no person can see or know for whom any other elector has voted or is voting, save an elector whom he or she has assisted or is assisting in voting, as prescribed by law;

It shall have voting devices for separate candidates and questions, which shall be arranged in separate parallel rows or columns, so that, at any primary, one or more adjacent rows or columns may be assigned to the candidates of a party or body and shall have parallel office columns or rows transverse thereto;

It shall have a public counter or other device, the register of which is visible from the outside of the machine, which shall show during any period of voting the total number of electors who have operated the machine during such period of voting;

It shall have a protective counter or other device, the register of which cannot be reset, which shall record the cumulative total number of movements of the operating mechanism;

It shall be provided with a lock or locks, by the use of which, immediately after the polls are closed or the operation of the machine for a primary or election is completed, all movements of the registering mechanism are absolutely prevented;

It shall be provided with a screen, hood, or curtain which shall conceal the actions of the elector while voting;

It shall be constructed of material of good quality in a neat and workmanlike manner;

It shall, when properly operated, register or record correctly and accurately every vote cast;

It shall be so constructed that an elector may readily learn the method of operating it;

It shall be safely transportable;

It shall be so constructed and controlled that during the progress of voting it shall preclude every person from seeing or knowing the number of votes registered for any candidate and from tampering with any of the registering mechanism; and

If it is of a type equipped with a mechanism for printing paper proof sheets and not requiring the counters to be made visible in order to canvass the votes recorded on the machine, the door or other device concealing such counters or keeping the same concealed may be equipped with a lock or locks, requiring the simultaneous use of three separate and substantially different keys to open or operate the same.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1206, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 851, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1969, p. 329, § 15a; Ga. L. 1993, p. 118, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 279, § 4; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Ballot secrecy, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Ballots, § 183-1-11-.01.

21-2-323.
Installation of voting machines; discontinuance of use of paper ballots; minimum number; different types; requirements as to working order and capacity.

When the use of voting machines has been authorized in the manner prescribed by Code Section 21-2-320 or 21-2-321, such voting machines shall be installed, either simultaneously or gradually, within the municipality. Upon the installation of voting machines in any precinct, the use of paper ballots therein shall be discontinued, except as otherwise provided by this chapter.

In each precinct in which voting machines are used, the municipal governing authority shall provide at least one voting machine for each 500 electors, or major fraction thereof, except that at least one voting machine shall be provided in each such precinct in any case.

Voting machines of different kinds may be used for different precincts in the same municipality.

The municipal governing authority shall provide voting machines in good working order and of sufficient capacity to accommodate the names of a reasonable number of candidates for all party offices and nominations and public offices, which, under existing laws and party rules, are likely to be voted for at any future primary or election.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1204, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 329, § 15; Ga. L. 1976, p. 463, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 5; Ga. L. 1983, p. 140, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 40/HB 244.

21-2-324.
Examination and approval of voting machines by Secretary of State; appointment and compensation of examiners; revocation of approval; written verification and certification prior to election or primary; penalties; conflicts of interest.

Any person or organization owning, manufacturing, or selling, or being interested in the manufacture or sale of, any voting machine may request the Secretary of State to examine the machine. Any ten or more electors of this state may, at any time, request the Secretary of State to reexamine any voting machine previously examined and approved by him or her. Before any such examination or reexamination, the person, persons, or organization requesting such examination or reexamination shall pay to the Secretary of State the reasonable expenses of such examination; provided, however, that in the case of a request by ten or more electors the examination fee shall be $250.00. The Secretary of State may, at any time, in his or her discretion, reexamine any voting machine.

The Secretary of State shall thereupon require such machine to be examined or reexamined by three examiners whom he or she shall appoint for the purpose, of whom one shall be an expert in patent law and the other two shall be experts in mechanics, and shall require of them a written report on such machine, attested by their signatures; and the Secretary of State shall examine the machine and shall make and file, together with the reports of the appointed examiners, his or her own report, attested by his or her signature and the seal of his or her office, stating whether, in his or her opinion and in consideration of the reports of the examiners aforesaid, the kind of machine so examined can be safely and accurately used by electors at primaries and elections as provided in this chapter. If his or her report states that the machine can be so used, the machine shall be deemed approved; and machines of its kind may be adopted for use at primaries and elections as provided in this chapter.

No kind of voting machine not so approved shall be used at any primary or election and if, upon the reexamination of any voting machine previously approved, it shall appear that the machine so reexamined can no longer be safely or accurately used by electors at primaries or elections as provided in this chapter because of any problem concerning its ability to accurately record or tabulate votes, the approval of the same shall immediately be revoked by the Secretary of State; and no such voting machine shall thereafter be purchased for use or be used in this state.

At least ten days prior to any primary or election, including special primaries, special elections, and referendum elections, the election superintendent shall verify and certify in writing to the Secretary of State that all voting will occur on equipment certified by the Secretary of State.

Any vendor who completes a sale of voting machines that have not been certified by the Secretary of State to a governmental body in this state shall be subject to a penalty of $100,000.00, payable to the State of Georgia, plus reimbursement of all costs and expenses incurred by the governmental body in connection with the sale. The State Election Board shall have authority to impose such penalty upon a finding that such a sale has occurred.

When a machine has been so approved, no improvement or change that does not impair its accuracy, efficiency, or capacity shall render necessary a reexamination or reapproval of the machine or of its kind.

Neither the Secretary of State, nor any examiner appointed by him or her for the purpose prescribed by this Code section, nor any superintendent, nor the governing authority of any municipality or a member of such authority, nor any other person involved in the examination process shall have any pecuniary interest in any voting machine or in the manufacture or sale thereof.

The compensation of each examiner appointed under this Code section shall be fixed and paid by the Secretary of State.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1205, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1087, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 240, § 22; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 41/HB 244.

21-2-325.
Form of ballot labels generally.

The ballot labels shall be printed in black ink upon clear, white, or pastel colored material, of such size as will fit the ballot frame, and in plain, clear type so as to be easily readable by persons with normal vision.

If the construction of the machine shall require it, the ballot label for each candidate, group of candidates, political party or body, or question to be voted on shall bear the designating letter or number of the counter on the voting machine which will register or record votes therefor. Each question to be voted on shall appear on the ballot labels in brief form. Unless otherwise provided by law, proposed constitutional amendments so submitted shall be in brief form as directed by the General Assembly and, in the failure to so direct, the form shall be determined by the Secretary of State. Unless otherwise provided by law, any other state-wide questions or questions to be presented to the electors of more than one county so submitted shall be printed in brief form as directed by the General Assembly and, in the event of a failure to so direct, the form shall be determined by the Secretary of State and shall include a short title or heading in bold face at the beginning of each such question on the ballot and any local questions so submitted shall be printed in brief form as directed by the General Assembly and, in the event of a failure to so direct, the form shall be determined by the superintendent. In the case of questions to be voted on by the electors of a municipality, the governing authority shall determine the brief form of the questions.

The ballot label for each candidate or group of candidates nominated by a party or body shall contain the name or designation of the party or body.

The titles of offices may be arranged horizontally or vertically, with the names of candidates for an office arranged transversely under or opposite the title of the office. The incumbency of a candidate seeking election for the public office he or she then holds shall be indicated on the ballot labels.

The names of all candidates nominated by a party or body shall appear in adjacent rows or columns containing generally the names of candidates nominated by such party or body, provided that the names of individual candidates for presidential elector shall not appear upon the ballot labels, but, in lieu thereof, the names of the candidates of such party or body for President and Vice President shall be printed together with the name of such party or body.

The form and arrangement of ballot labels shall be prepared by the superintendent.

The names of all candidates of a party or body shall appear in the same row or column, and no other names shall appear in the same row or column. The names of candidates and independent candidates shall be arranged under or opposite the title of the office for which they are candidates and shall appear in the order prescribed by subsection (c) and the second sentence of subsection (e) of Code Section 21-2-285. The rows or columns occupied by the names of the candidates of political parties and bodies shall be arranged according to the priority prescribed by subsection (c) of Code Section 21-2-285. When voting machines are used on which the titles of offices are arranged horizontally, the names of all candidates for the same office shall appear within the same vertical lines.

In primaries, the ballot labels containing the names of candidates seeking nomination by a political party shall be segregated on the face of the machine in adjacent rows or columns by parties, the priority of such political parties on the ballot labels to be determined in the order prescribed by subsection (c) of Code Section 21-2-285. If a nonpartisan election is being held in conjunction with a partisan primary, each partisan ballot label shall be clearly marked to indicate that the elector may vote in the nonpartisan election also. In nonpartisan elections, the ballot labels shall include a separate portion for the names of candidates seeking election in a nonpartisan election and the heading and arrangement of such candidates shall be as prescribed by Code Section 21-2-285.1 insofar as practicable. At the top of the separate portion shall be printed in prominent type the words “OFFICIAL NONPARTISAN ELECTION BALLOT.”

In primaries, if it shall be impracticable to place on the ballot labels of one machine the names of all candidates seeking nomination in all political parties and the names of all candidates seeking election in a nonpartisan election, the superintendent may arrange for the names of all the candidates seeking nomination in any one political party to be placed on separate voting machines; provided, however, that the names of all candidates seeking election in a nonpartisan election shall appear on all machines.

Within the instruction section of the ballot label there shall be printed the following:

“I understand that the offer or acceptance of money or any other object of value to vote for any particular candidate, list of candidates, issue, or list of issues included in this election constitutes an act of voter fraud and is a felony under Georgia law.”

Any other provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, in the event there is no opposed candidate in a precinct in a special or general election, no special or general election shall be held in such precinct unless a write-in candidate has qualified as provided by law or unless there are issues to be submitted to the electorate. Each such unopposed candidate shall be deemed to have voted for himself or herself. Where feasible, the superintendent shall provide notice reasonably calculated to inform the affected electorate that no special or general election is to be conducted. The superintendent shall certify such unopposed candidate as elected in the same manner as he or she certifies other candidates as elected pursuant to Code Section 21-2-493.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1208, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 851, § 4; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1053, § 6; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1004, § 19; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1979, § 2; Ga. L. 1979, p. 624, § 2; Ga. L. 1980, p. 437, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 5; Ga. L. 1983, p. 140, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1190, § 13; Ga. L. 1984, p. 133, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 772, § 4; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1538, § 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 34, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 647, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 10, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 279, § 5; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1027, § 7; Ga. L. 1996, p. 145, § 16; Ga. L. 1997, p. 8, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 590, § 29; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1231, §§ 11, 35; Ga. L. 2001, p. 269, § 20; Ga. L. 2011, p. 678, § 6/HB 158; Ga. L. 2012, p. 995, § 23/SB 92.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 1190, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that it was the intent of that Act to implement the provisions of Ga. Const. 1983, Art. VI, Sec. VII, Para. I.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Appearance of candidate’s name on ballot, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Ballots, § 183-1-11-.02.

Law reviews.

For article, “Local Government Law,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 389 (2001).

For note on the 2001 amendment to this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 96 (2001).

21-2-325.1.
Candidates with same or similar names.

If two or more candidates for the same nomination or office shall have the same or similar names, the Secretary of State, in the case of federal or state offices, the superintendent of elections, in the case of county offices, or the official with whom such candidates qualify, in the case of municipal elections, shall print or cause to be printed the residence address of all candidates for such nomination or office on the ballot labels under their names. The designated official shall determine whether the names of the candidates are of such a similar nature as to warrant printing the residence address of all candidates for that office on the ballot labels; and the decision of the designated official shall be conclusive.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-325.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 230, § 10; Ga. L. 2001, p. 240, § 23; Ga. L. 2003, p. 151, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

The enactment of this Code section by Ga. L. 2001, p. 230, § 10, irreconcilably conflicted with and was treated as superseded by Ga. L. 2001, p. 240, § 23. See County of Butts v. Strahan,

151 Ga. 417

(1921).

Law reviews.

For note on the 2001 enactment of this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 114 (2001).

21-2-326.
Unofficial ballot labels.

If ballot labels for a precinct at which a voting machine is to be used are not delivered to the poll officers as required by this chapter, the chief manager of such precinct shall cause other labels to be prepared, printed, or written, as nearly in the form of official ballot labels as practicable; and the poll officers shall cause the labels, so substituted, to be used at the primary or election, in the same manner, as nearly as may be, as the official labels. Such labels, so substituted, shall be known as unofficial ballot labels.

If any voting machine shall become out of order during a primary or election and repair or substitution cannot be made, paper ballots, either printed or written, and of any suitable form, may be used for the taking of votes.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1215, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1004, § 21; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 5; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-327.
Preparation of voting machines; custodians and their deputies; inspection; furnishing of supplies.

The superintendent of each municipality shall cause the proper ballot labels to be placed on each voting machine which is to be used in any precinct within such municipality, cause each machine to be placed in proper order for voting, examine each machine before it is sent out to a polling place, see that each registering counter on each machine is set at zero, lock each machine so that the counting machinery cannot be operated, and seal each machine with a numbered seal. The superintendent or his or her agent shall adjust each machine to be used at a primary, so that the poll officers may lock it on primary day, in such a way that each elector can vote only for the candidates seeking nomination by the political party in whose primary he or she is then voting and so that no elector can vote for the candidates seeking nomination by any political party in whose primary he or she is not then voting.

The superintendent shall appoint one custodian of voting machines and such deputy custodians as may be necessary, whose duty it shall be to prepare the machines to be used at the primaries and elections to be held therein. Each custodian and deputy custodian shall receive from the municipality such compensation as shall be fixed by the governing authority of the municipality. Such custodian shall, under the direction of the superintendent, have charge of and represent the superintendent during the preparation of the voting machines as required by this chapter, and he or she and the deputy custodians, whose duty it shall be to assist him or her in the discharge of his or her duties, shall serve at the pleasure of the superintendent. Each custodian shall take an oath of office framed by the Secretary of State, which shall be filed with the superintendent.

On or before the twelfth day preceding a primary or election, including special primaries, special elections, and referendum elections, the superintendent shall mail to the foreperson of the grand jury, the chairperson of the county executive committee of each political party which shall be entitled under existing laws to participate in primaries within the county, and to the chairperson or presiding officer of any organization of citizens within the county having as its purpose or among its purposes the investigation or prosecution of primary and election frauds, which has registered its name and address and the names of its principal officers with the superintendent at least 30 days before such primary or election, and, in the case of an election, to the appropriate committee of each political body which shall be entitled to have the names of its candidates entered on the voting machines, and to each independent candidate who shall be entitled to have his or her name printed on the voting machines, a written notice stating the times when and the place or places where preparation of the machines for use in the several precincts will be started. The grand jury shall appoint a committee, consisting of three of its members, which shall inspect the machines and see that the machines are properly prepared and are placed in proper condition and order for use. In the event the committee of the grand jury fails to be present, the superintendent shall immediately appoint a panel consisting of three electors to perform the duties of the committee of the grand jury set forth in this Code section. Further, one representative of each political party or body, certified by the chairperson of such political party or body, and one representative of each aforementioned organization of citizens, certified by the chairperson or presiding officer of such organization, and any such independent candidate or his or her certified agent shall be entitled to be present during the preparation of the machines and to see that the machines are properly prepared and are placed in proper condition and order for use. Such committee of the grand jury, representatives, or candidates shall not, however, interfere with the preparation of the machines; and the superintendent may make such reasonable rules and regulations concerning the conduct of such representatives and candidates.

The custodian and deputy custodians of voting machines and the members of the committee of the grand jury, if any, shall make an affidavit, which each shall sign, and request each representative of a party, body, or a citizens’ organization, or candidate or his or her agent present at the preparation of the machine to attest, and which shall be filed with the city clerk, stating:

The identifying number or other designation of the voting machine;

That each registering counter on the machine was set at zero;

The number registered on the protective counter or other device of the machine; and

The number on the seal with which the machine is sealed.

No superintendent nor custodian nor other employee of the superintendent shall, in any way, prevent free access to and examination of all voting machines which are to be used at the primary or election by any of the duly appointed representatives or candidates aforesaid; and the superintendent and his or her employees shall afford to each such representative or candidate every facility for the examination of all registering counters, protective counters, and public counters of each and every voting machine.

In every primary or election, the superintendent shall furnish, at the expense of the municipality, all ballot labels, forms of certificates, and other papers and supplies which are required under this chapter and which are not furnished by the Secretary of State, all of which shall be in the form and according to the specifications prescribed from time to time by the Secretary of State. In a municipal primary, ballot labels and other materials necessary for the preparation of the voting machines shall be furnished free of charge to the municipal superintendent by the political party conducting such primary.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1209, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 16; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1053, § 7; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1004, § 20; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 5; Ga. L. 1987, p. 34, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 56, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 118, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 240, § 24; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 42/HB 244.

21-2-328.
Delivery, set up, and sealing of properly furnished voting machines prior to primary or election; protection of voting machines against molestation or injury.

The superintendent shall deliver the proper voting machine or voting machines, properly furnished with ballot labels, to the polling places of the respective precincts at least one hour before the time set for opening the polls at each primary or election and shall cause each machine to be set up in the proper manner for use in voting. Each machine shall then remain sealed until the examination immediately preceding the opening of the polls prescribed by this chapter.

The superintendent shall provide ample protection against molestation of and injury to the voting machine and, for that purpose, shall call upon any law enforcement officer to furnish such assistance as may be necessary; and it shall be the duty of the law enforcement officer to furnish such assistance when so requested by the superintendent.

The superintendent shall furnish for each voting machine at least one hour before the opening of the polls:

A lamp which shall give sufficient light to enable electors, while in the voting machine booth, to read the ballot labels, and which shall be suitable for the use of poll officers in examining the counters; and the lamp shall be prepared and in good order for use before the opening of the polls;

Two diagrams, of suitable size, representing such part of the face of such voting machine as will be in use in the primary or election and accompanied by directions for voting on the machine; and such diagrams shall be posted prominently outside the enclosed space within the polling place; and

A seal for sealing the machine after the polls are closed; an envelope for the return of the keys, if the construction of the voting machine shall permit their separate return; and such other election materials and supplies as may be necessary or as may be required by law.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1210, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 5; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

Cross references.

Penalty for tampering with voting machines, §§

21-2-566

and

21-2-580

.

21-2-329.
Delivery of voting machine keys to chief manager.

The superintendent shall deliver the keys which unlock the operating mechanism and the registering counters or counter compartment of the voting machine to the chief manager not later than one hour before the time set for the opening of the polls and shall take his or her receipt therefor. The keys shall be enclosed in a sealed envelope on which shall be written or printed:

The number of the voting machine;

The designation of the precinct;

The number of the seal; and

The number registered on the protective counter or device as reported by the custodian;

provided, however, that, if the type of voting machine used requires the simultaneous use of three keys to unlock the registering counters or counter compartment, only two of the said keys shall be enclosed in such sealed envelope, the third key being retained by the custodian or the superintendent.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1212, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 5; Ga. L. 1987, p. 34, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

Cross references.

Unauthorized making or possession of voting machine key, §

21-2-581

.

21-2-330.
Public exhibition of and instruction on sample voting machine.

During the five days preceding a municipal general primary or election or during the three days preceding a municipal special primary or election, the superintendent shall place on public exhibition, in such public places and at such times as he or she may deem most suitable for the information and instruction of the electors, one or more voting machines containing the ballot labels and showing the offices and questions to be voted upon, the names and arrangements of parties and bodies, and, so far as practicable, the names and arrangements of the candidates to be voted for. Such machine or machines shall be under the charge and care of a person competent as custodian and instructor. No voting machine which is to be assigned for use in a primary or election shall be used for such public exhibition and instruction after having been prepared and sealed for the primary or election.

During such public exhibition and instruction, the counting mechanism of the voting machine shall be concealed from view and the doors or cover concealing the same shall be opened, if at all, only temporarily and only upon written authorization from the superintendent.

Prior to any primary or election, the superintendent may cause copies of any diagram or diagrams required to be furnished with voting machines at polling places to be made, either in full size or in reduced size, and to be posted, published, advertised, or distributed among the electors in such manner as he or she may deem desirable.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1213, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 21; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 43/HB 244.

21-2-331.
Designation and compensation of custodians of voting machines and keys; storage of voting machines when not in use.

The municipal governing authority shall designate a person or persons who shall have the custody of the voting machines of the municipality and the keys therefor when the machines are not in use at a primary or election and shall provide for his or her compensation and for the safe storage and care of the machines and keys.

All voting machines, when not in use, shall be properly covered and stored in a suitable place or places.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1216, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 44/HB 244.

21-2-332.
Use of portable polling facilities.

In precincts in which voting machines are used, the superintendent may, in his or her discretion, procure and provide portable polling facilities of adequate size for any or all of such precincts.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1211, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 5; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-333.
Responsibility of municipal governing authority to provide for payment for voting machines; issuance of bonds or other indebtedness to meet costs.

The governing authority of any municipality which adopts voting machines in a manner provided for by this article shall, upon the purchase of voting machines, provide for their payment by the municipality. Bonds or other evidence of indebtedness may be issued in accordance with the provisions of law relating to the increase of indebtedness of municipalities to meet all or any part of the cost of the voting machines.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1207, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 45/HB 244.

21-2-334.
Voting by paper ballot when use of voting machine impossible or impracticable.

If a method of nomination or election for any candidate or office, or of voting on any question is prescribed by law, in which the use of voting machines is not possible or practicable, or in case, at any primary or election, the number of candidates seeking nomination or nominated for any office renders the use of voting machines for such office at such primary or election impracticable, or if, for any other reason, at any primary or election the use of voting machines wholly or in part is not practicable, the superintendent may arrange to have the voting for such candidates or offices or for such questions conducted by paper ballots. In such cases, paper ballots shall be printed for such candidates, offices, or questions, and the primary or election shall be conducted by the poll officers, and the ballots shall be counted and return thereof made in the manner required by law for such nominations, offices, or questions, insofar as paper ballots are used.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1214, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.